Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Chapter 9. Dams

§ 401.
Lake Seymour.

The Public Utility Commission shall ascertain and establish the natural maximum and minimum water levels of Lake Seymour at the outlet, excluding from its determination of such levels the effect on natural conditions disturbed by blasting of the barrier, changes in the depth and width of the channel above and below the barrier, as well as the effect the present control dam may have on such levels.
When such levels are so established, the Commission shall certify its findings to the Secretary of State and cause the same to be recorded in the offices of the town clerks of the towns of Morgan and Charleston.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 402.
Prohibition.

The waters of Lake Seymour shall not by any artificial means be raised higher or drawn lower, or permitted through neglect to become lower or higher, than the maximum and minimum levels established by the Commission.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 403.
Penalty.

A person, firm, or corporation who violates a provision of sections 401 and 402 of this title shall be subject to the penalty set forth in

10 V.S.A. § 1094

.

§ 404.
Great Averill Pond, Little Averill Pond, Norton Lake.

The Public Utility Commission shall establish maximum and minimum water levels of Great Averill Pond, located in the towns of Averill and Norton, and Little Averill Pond, located in the town of Averill, and Norton Lake, located in the town of Norton and in Warren’s Gore, at their outlets. The Commission may revise its findings from time to time either on its own motion or on petition of interested parties and, after opportunity for hearing, establish different water levels. When such levels are so established, the Commission shall certify its findings to the Secretary of State and cause the same to be recorded in the office of the town clerk of Norton.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1993, No. 21

, § 12, eff. May 12, 1993.

§ 405.
Prohibition.

The waters of Great Averill and Little Averill ponds and Norton Lake shall not by any artificial means be raised higher or drawn lower, or permitted through neglect to become lower or higher, than the maximum and minimum levels established by the Commission.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 406.
Penalty.

A person, firm, or corporation who violates a provision of sections 404 and 405 of this title shall be subject to penalties in the same manner as a violation of 10 V.S.A. chapter 43.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 74

, § 126.